Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5959HV (2) 91 je/ns H.F. 2242 Section 1. Section 262.9, subsection 19, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Prohibit any increase in the amount of 3 tuition charged by an institution of higher education under the 4 boardâs control to resident undergraduate students on or after 5 the effective date of this Act. This paragraph is repealed 6 July 1, 2031. 7 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 8 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 9